Utah statutes.
59-14-303.   Remittance of tax -- Returns -- Invoice required -- Filing
requirements -- Reports -- Exceptions -- Penalties -- Overpayments.
(1)  The taxes imposed on all tobacco products shall be remitted to the
commission together with quarterly returns as prescribed by the commission.
These returns shall be due and payable to the commission quarterly on or
before the last day of the month following each calendar quarterly period.
(2)  Every manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or any other person selling
tobacco products to persons other than ultimate consumers shall furnish with
each sale an itemized invoice showing the seller's name and address, the name
and address of the purchaser, the date of sale, the name and price of the
product, and the discount, if any.  A notation should be made that the price
includes or does not include the tax.  Copies of this invoice shall be
retained by the seller and the purchaser and shall be available for inspection
by the commission or its agent for a period of three years following the sale.
(3) (a)  A consumer who purchases untaxed products subject to the tax imposed
by this part for use or other consumption, shall file with the commission, on
forms prescribed by the commission, a statement showing the quantity and
description of the products and pay the tax imposed by this part on those
products.
(b)  The statement described in Subsection (3)(a) shall be filed and the tax
paid on or before the last day of the month immediately following the month
during which the tobacco products were purchased.
(c)  A consumer shall maintain records necessary to determine the amount of
tax the consumer is liable to pay under this part for a period of three years
following the date the return required by this part was filed.
(4)  No report is required from tourists who import any products taxed by this
part if the products are for their own use or consumption while in this state.
(5)  In addition to the tax required by this part, a person shall pay a
penalty as provided in Section 59-1-401, plus interest at the rate and in the
manner prescribed in Section 59-1-402, if a person subject to this section
fails to:
(a)  pay the tax prescribed by this part;
(b)  pay the tax on time; or
(c)  file a return required by this part.
(6)  An overpayment of a tax imposed by this part shall accrue interest at the
rate and in the manner prescribed in Section 59-1-402.
